Hawaii statutes.
[§187A-12.4 Misrepresentation or false
statement in receipts and reports.] Any person who knowingly misrepresents
any material fact or makes a false statement in any document required by
subtitle 5 of title 12, or any rule adopted thereunder, shall be guilty of a
petty misdemeanor and punished as provided by law. [L 1999, c 195, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next